Wisconsin, session 2025, AB413.
do enact as follows:AB413,13Section 1. 97.67 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB413,2,5497.67 (1) Except as provided in sub. subs. (1g) and (1k) and s. 93.135, the 5department or a local health department granted agent status under s. 97.615 (2) 6shall issue licenses to and regulate campgrounds and camping resorts, recreational 1and educational camps and public swimming pools. No Except as provided in sub. 2(1k), no person or state or local government who has not been issued a license under 3this section may conduct, maintain, manage or operate a campground and camping 4resort, recreational camp and educational camp or public swimming pool, as 5defined by departmental rule.AB413,26Section 2. 97.67 (1k) of the statutes is created to read:AB413,2,9797.67 (1k) (a) For the purpose of this subsection, “farm” means all land under 8common ownership that is primarily devoted to agricultural production, 9harvesting, or husbandry.AB413,2,1210(b) A person may operate a campground without a campground license if the 11campground is located on the person’s farm, the person’s farm has no more than one 12campground, and the campground has 3 or fewer campsites.AB413,2,1313